Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.185

Inspection of property where marine species located—Prohibitions on harvest or landing—Penalties.

(1) The department may enter and inspect any property, lands, or waters, of this state in or on which any marine species are located or from which such species are harvested, whether recreationally or for sale or barter, and any land or water of this state which may cause or contribute to the pollution of areas in or on which such species are harvested or processed. The department may take any reasonably necessary samples to determine whether such species or any lot, batch, or quantity of such species is safe for human consumption.

(2) If the department determines that any species or any lot, batch, or other quantity of such species is unsafe for human consumption because consumption is likely to cause actual harm or because consumption presents a potential risk of substantial harm, the department may, by order under chapter 34.05 RCW, prohibit or restrict the commercial or recreational harvest or landing of any marine species except the recreational harvest of shellfish as defined in chapter 69.30 RCW if taken from privately owned tidelands.

(3) It is unlawful to harvest any marine species in violation of a departmental order prohibiting or restricting such harvest under this section or to possess or sell any marine species so harvested.

(4)(a) Any person who sells any marine species taken in violation of this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor and subject to the penalties provided in RCW 69.30.140 and 69.30.150.

(b) Any person who harvests or possesses marine species taken in violation of this section is guilty of a civil infraction and is subject to the penalties provided in RCW 69.30.150.

(c) Notwithstanding this section, any person who harvests, possesses, sells, offers to sell, culls, shucks, or packs shellfish is subject to the penalty provisions of chapter 69.30 RCW.

(d) Charges shall not be brought against a person under both chapter 69.30 RCW and this section in connection with this same action, incident, or event.

(5) The criminal provisions of this section are subject to enforcement by fish and wildlife officers or ex officio fish and wildlife officers as defined in RCW 77.08.010.

(6) As used in this section, marine species include all fish, invertebrate or plant species which are found during any portion of the life cycle of those species in the marine environment.

[ 2003 c 53 s 231; 2001 c 253 s 2; 1995 c 147 s 7.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.